Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "communication disorder" means a health condition or
disability that may impede effective communication with a peace officer,
including:
(a) A communication impediment;
(b) Blindness or a visual impairment;
(c) Autism spectrum disorder;
(d) A drug allergy;
(e) Alzheimer's disease or dementia;
(f) Post-traumatic stress disorder;
(g) Traumatic brain injury;
(h) Schizophrenia;
(i) Epilepsy;
(j) A developmental disability;
(k) Down syndrome;
(l) Diabetes; or
(m) A heart condition.
The Transportation Cabinet may identify other communication disorders through
administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may inform the county clerk that he or she,
[or ]someone who may be operating the vehicle, or someone who is a regular
passenger in the vehicle is deaf or hard of hearing and request that information be
included in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database to assist law
enforcement in identifying the operator or a regular passenger of the vehicle as
possibly being deaf or hard of hearing.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/28/2025 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1243
(3) The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may inform the county clerk that he or she,
[or ]someone who may be operating the vehicle, or someone who is a regular
passenger in the vehicle has a communication disorder and request that information
be included in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database to assist law
enforcement in identifying the operator or a regular passenger of the vehicle as
possibly having a communication disorder.
(4) (a) The deaf or hard of hearing protection trust fund is created as a separate trust
fund in the State Treasury. The trust fund shall consist of any proceeds from
gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available
for the purposes of the trust fund.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Commission on the Deaf or
Hard of Hearing.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, trust fund amounts not expended at the close of
a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(d) Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become part of the trust fund and
shall not lapse.
(e) Trust fund moneys deposited in this fund shall only be used to:
1. Reimburse the Transportation Cabinet for the cost of including
information that someone is deaf or hard of hearing or has a
communication disorder in the Kentucky vehicle registration system
database;
2. Support other actions to protect the safety and welfare of persons who
are deaf or hard of hearing or have a communication disorder; and
3. Educate the public, the deaf and hard of hearing community, and the
communication disorder community on issues confronting the deaf and
hard of hearing and those with communication disorders.
(5) (a) Every county clerk shall post a permanent notice containing information about
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/28/2025 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1243
the availability of a deaf or hard of hearing or a communication disorder
designation in the Kentucky vehicle registration database. The notice shall be
printed in bold face type of sufficient point size to be read from a distance of
at least three (3) feet. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place to
ensure that every person who enters the county clerk's office will readily see
the notice.
(b) The Transportation Cabinet shall put information on its website[Web site]
about the availability of a deaf or hard of hearing or a communication disorder
designation in the Kentucky vehicle registration database.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/28/2025 11:50 AM Jacketed